Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.371

Organ transport vehicle.

"Organ transport vehicle" means any vehicle operated or contracted by an organ procurement organization as defined in RCW 68.64.010, and clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle.

[ 2023 c 290 s 1.]